Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.712

Child care—High-potency synthetic opioids in the home.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall establish a pilot program for contracted child care slots for infants in child protective services in locales with the historically highest rates of child welfare screened-in intake due to the exposure or presence of high-potency synthetic opioids in the home, which may be used as part of a safety plan. Unused slots under this section may be used for children who are screened in due to a parent's substance use disorder when the substance use disorder is related to a substance other than a high-potency synthetic opioid.

[ 2024 c 328 s 201.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 328: See note following RCW 13.34.050.